Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB1.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 14 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 25F(g):
(a) The General Assembly hereby designates itself under state law to make the election on behalf of the
Commonwealth with respect to federal tax benefits under 26 U.S.C. sec. 25F;
(b) The General Assembly hereby elects that in each calendar year the Commonwealth of Kentucky
shall:
1. Participate in the qualified elementary and secondary education scholarship federal tax credit
established under 26 U.S.C. sec. 25F, or any successor program, for individuals who make
qualifying contributions to scholarship granting organizations; and
2. Identify scholarship granting organizations in the state;
(c) The Secretary of State is hereby designated under Kentucky law as the sole official authorized to:
1. Report the state's election to participate in the qualified elementary and secondary education
scholarship federal tax credit under 26 U.S.C. sec. 25F; and
2. Submit a list as described in 26 U.S.C sec. 25F(g) and perform other functions necessary to
implement the General Assembly's election under paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(d) The Secretary of State shall notify the United States Secretary of the Treasury of the
Commonwealth's participation in the qualified elementary and secondary education scholarship
federal tax credit and submit the list established by the Secretary of State by January 1 of each year.
(2) The Secretary of State shall publish the associated administrative regulations and other applicable guidance
issued by the United States Secretary of the Treasury or the Internal Revenue Service on the Secretary of
State's website.
(3) The Secretary of State may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
necessary to carry out this section.
(4) The Secretary of State shall collect a fee from scholarship granting organizations or accept private
contributions to pay the necessary costs of administration of this section. All amounts received under this
subsection shall be deposited in a restricted fund account, not commingled, and shall be used solely to
administer this section.
(5) Any immunity under the Eleventh Amendment to the Constitution of the United States is waived under this
section.
Veto Overridden March 17, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version